zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 哺乳与喂养 > 吸奶器配件: 携带包和手提包; 清洁刷和湿巾; 连接器和适配器; 免手扶吸奶文胸; 导管; 阀门和隔膜
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Emzirme ve Beslenme > Göğüs Pompası Aksesuarları: Taşıma Çantaları ve Kılıfları; Temizleme Fırçaları ve Mendilleri; Konektörler ve Adaptörler; Eller Serbest Pompalama Sütyeni; Boru; Vanalar ve Membranlar
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dojenje i hranjenje > Pribor za izdajalice: Torbe za nošenje; Četke i maramice za čišćenje; Konektori i adapteri; Grudnjaci za izdajanje bez ruku; Cijevi; Ventili i membrane
cs: Děti a kojenci > Kojení a krmení > Příslušenství k odsávačkám mateřského mléka: Přepravní tašky a kabelky; Čistící kartáčky a ubrousky; Konektory a adaptéry; Hands-free podprsenky pro snadné odsávání; Trubičky; Ventily a membrány
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Alăptare și hrănire > Accesorii pentru pompă pentru sâni: Genți și sacoșe de transport; Perii și șervețele pentru curățare; Conectori și adaptoare; Sutiene pentru pompare hands-free; Tuburi; Supape și membrane
sv: Baby och småbarn > Amning och matning > Bröstpumpstillbehör: Bärväskor och kassar; Rengöringsborstar och våtservetter; Kontakter och adaptrar; Handsfree-pumpbehåar; Slangar; Ventiler och membran
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Karmienie > Akcesoria do laktatorów: Torby i futerały; Szczotki i ściereczki do czyszczenia; Złącza i adaptery; Biustonosze do odciągania pokarmu bez użycia rąk; Świetlówka; Zawory i membrany
it: Bebè e bimbi > Allattamento e alimentazione > Accessori per tiralatte: Borse e borsoni per il trasporto; Spazzole e salviette per la pulizia; Connettori e adattatori; Reggiseni tiralatte a mani libere; Tubicini; Valvole e membrane
da: Baby og småbørn > Amning og madning > Tilbehør til brystpumper: Bæretasker og -muleposer; Rengøringsbørster og -servietter; Stik og adaptere; Håndfri pumpe-bh'er; Slanger; Ventiler og membraner
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Cho con bú và cho ăn > Phụ kiện hút nữa: Túi đựng & túi tote; Cọ & khăn lau; Đầu nối & bộ điều hợp; Áo hút sữa rảnh tay; Ống hút sữa; Van & màng
ru: Товары для детей > Питание и кормление > Аксессуары для молокоотсосов: Сумки для переноски; Щетки и салфетки для очистки; Соединители и адаптеры; Бюстгальтеры для сцеживания молока; Трубки; Клапаны и мембраны
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dojenje in hranjenje > Dodatki za prsne črpalke: Nosilne torbe in vreče; Krtače za čiščenje in krpice; Priključki in adapterji; Nedrčki za prostoročno črpanje; Cevke; Ventili in membrane
ja: ベビー用品 > 授乳・離乳食 > 搾乳器関連用品: キャリーバッグ・トートバッグ; クリーニングブラシ・ワイプ; コネクタ・アダプター; ハンズフリー 搾乳ブラ; チューブ; バルブ・メンブレン
en: Baby & Toddler > Nursing & Feeding > Breast Pump Accessories: Carrying Bags & Totes; Cleaning Brushes & Wipes; Connectors & Adapters; Hands Free Pumping Bras; Tubing; Valves & Membranes
nb: Baby og barn > Amming og mating > Tilbehør for brystpumper: Bærevesker og -nett; Rengjøringsbørster og -kluter; Kontakter og adaptere; Håndfrie pumpe-BH-er; Slanger; Ventiler og membraner
pt-BR: Infantil > Amamentação e alimentação > Acessórios para bomba extratora de leite materno: Bolsas e sacolas de transporte; Escovas e panos de limpeza; Conectores e adaptadores; Sutiãs de bombeamento com mãos livres; Tubulação; Válvulas e membranas
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Allaitement et alimentation > Accessoires pour tire-laits: Sacs de transport et fourre-tout; Brosses et lingettes de nettoyage; Connecteurs et adaptateurs; Soutiens-gorge de tire-laits mains libres; Tubes; Vannes et membranes
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Θηλασμός & σίτιση > Αξεσουάρ για θήλαστρα: Τσάντες & σακούλες μεταφοράς; Βούρτσες & μαντηλάκια καθαρισμού; Σύνδεσμοι & προσαρμογείς; Σουτιέν Θηλασμού χωρίς χέρια; Σωληνώσεις; Βαλβίδες & μεμβράνες
ko: 영유아 > 수유/이유식 용품 > 유축기 부대용품: 휴대용 가방/토트백; 청소용 브러시/물티슈; 연결부/어댑터; 핸즈프리 수유 브라; 튜브; 벨브/멤브레인
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Lactancia y alimentación > Accesorios para sacaleches: Bolsas y bolsos de transporte; Cepillos y toallitas de limpieza; Conectores y adaptadores; Sujetadores de bombeo manos libres; Tubos; Válvulas y membranas
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Imetys ja syöttäminen > Rintapumpun lisätarvikkeet: Kantolaukut ja -kassit; Puhdistusharjat ja -liinat; Liittimet ja sovittimet; Hands free -pumppausliivit; Letkustot; Venttiilit ja kalvot
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Žindymas ir maitinimas > Pientraukių priedai: Krepšiai ir dėklai; Valymo šepetėliai ir servetėlės; Jungtys ir adapteriai; Laisvų rankų siurbimo liemenėlės; Vamzdeliai; Vožtuvai ir membranos
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Stillen & Füttern > Milchpumpenzubehör: Tragetaschen; Reinigungsbürsten und -tücher; Steckverbinder und Adapter; BHs für freihändiges Pumpen; Zugang; Ventile und Membranen
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Кърмене и хранене > Аксесоари за помпа за кърма: Чанти и несесери; Почистващи четки и кърпички; Конектори и адаптери; Сутиен за помпа за кърма; Тръби; Клапани и мембрани
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Szoptatás és etetés > Mellszívó-kiegészítők: Hordtáskák; Tisztítókefék és törlőkendők; Csatlakozók és adapterek; Kézmentes szívómelltartók; Csövek; Szelepek és membránok
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การให้นม > อุปกรณ์ที่ปั๊มนม: กระเป๋าโททและกระเป๋าถือ; แปรงและผ้าเช็ดทำความสะอาด; ตัวเชื่อมต่อและอแดปเตอร์; บราสำหรับปั๊มนมแบบแฮนด์ฟรี; การสอดท่อ; วาล์วและเมมเบรน
sk-SK: Bábätká > Dojčenie a kŕmenie > Príslušenstvo k odsávačkám mlieka: Prenosné vrecká a tašky; Čistiace kefy a obrúsky; Konektory a adaptéry; Podprsenky na automatické odsávanie mlieka; Hadičky; Ventily a membrány
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 哺育和餵食 > 擠乳器配件: 手提包和托特包; 清潔刷和濕紙巾; 接頭和轉接環; 免手持哺乳胸罩; 管子; 活塞和薄膜
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Amamentação e alimentação > Acessórios de bomba de aleitamento: Sacos e malas totes de transporte; Escovas e toalhitas de limpeza; Conectores e adaptadores; Soutiens de extração de leite mãos-livres; Tubagem; Válvulas e membranas
nl: Baby en peuter > Borstvoeding en voeding > Kolfaccessoires: Draagtassen en -mandjes; Schoonmaakborstels en -doekjes; Aansluitingen en adapters; Handsfree kolfbeha's; Slangen; Kleppen en membranen